New York, session 2025-2026, S6696.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 239-c 2 to read as follows: 3 § 239-c. Scores required on regents examinations for college credit. 4 1. A student shall receive an average score of eighty across all ten 5 regents examinations, and attain a regents diploma, in order to receive 6 three college credits towards general coursework at a university. Each 7 university shall determine which general education coursework those 8 credits may be applied to on an individual basis and in consultation 9 with such student. 10 2. A student shall receive an average score of eighty-five across any 11 four regents examinations, and attain a regents diploma, in order to 12 receive three college credits towards general coursework at a universi- 13 ty. Each university shall determine which general education coursework 14 those credits may be applied to on an individual basis and in consulta- 15 tion with such student. 16 3. A student shall receive an average score of ninety across any four 17 regents examinations, and attain a regents diploma with an advanced 18 designation with honors, in order to receive six college credits towards 19 general coursework at a university. Each university shall determine 20 which general education coursework those credits may be applied to on an 21 individual basis and in consultation with such student. 22 4. A student shall be prohibited from availing themselves of multiple 23 provisions of this section. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09228-01-5 S. 6696 2 1 5. Nothing in this section shall make any regents exam mandatory 2 starting in the two thousand twenty-seven--two thousand twenty-eight 3 school year. 4 § 2. The education law is amended by adding a new section 6235 to read 5 as follows: 6 § 6235 . Scores required on regents examinations for college credit. 7 1. A student shall receive an average score of eighty across all ten 8 regents examinations, and attain a regents diploma, in order to receive 9 three college credits towards general coursework at a city university. 10 Each university shall determine which general education coursework those 11 credits may be applied to on an individual basis and in consultation 12 with such student. 13 2. A student shall receive an average score of eighty-five across any 14 four regents examinations, and attain a regents diploma, in order to 15 receive three college credits towards general coursework at a city 16 university. Each university shall determine which general education 17 coursework those credits may be applied to on an individual basis and in 18 consultation with such student. 19 3. A student shall receive an average score of ninety across any four 20 regents examinations, and attain a regents diploma with an advanced 21 designation with honors, in order to receive six college credits towards 22 general coursework at a city university. Each university shall determine 23 which general education coursework those credits may be applied to on an 24 individual basis and in consultation with such student. 25 4. A student shall be prohibited from availing themselves of multiple 26 provisions of this section. 27 5. Nothing in this section shall make any regents exam mandatory 28 starting in the two thousand twenty-seven--two thousand twenty-eight 29 school year. 30 § 3. This act shall take effect August 1, 2027. Effectively immediate- 31 ly, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation 32 necessary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 33 authorized to be made and completed on or before such date.